Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2888.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 45, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 45-120, to read: START_STATUTE45-120. Tribal drinking water access and infrastructure fund; exemption A. The tribal drinking water access and infrastructure fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations. The department shall administer the fund.  Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. B. The department shall use monies in the fund to award grants to federally recognized Indian tribes and to authorities designated by federally recognized Indian tribes.  Grant monies awarded pursuant to this subsection may be used for either of the following purposes: 1. Planning, engineering, constructing and procuring emergency water access. 2. Funding the development of water infrastructure projects, including water hauling points, wells, treatment facilities and pipeline connections.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; tribal drinking water access and infrastructure fund; exemption A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the water conservation grant fund established by section 49-1331, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the tribal drinking water access and infrastructure fund established by section 45-120, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.